Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.121

Board—Request for ruling—Fee—Costs.

Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity desiring a decision of the board pursuant to RCW 19.28.111 shall, in writing, notify the director of such desire and shall accompany the notice with a certified check payable to the department in the sum of two hundred dollars. The notice shall specify the ruling or interpretation desired and the contention of the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity as to the proper interpretation or application on the question on which a decision is desired. If the board determines that the contention of the applicant for a decision was proper, the two hundred dollars shall be returned to the applicant; otherwise it shall be used in paying the expenses and per diem of the members of the board in connection with the matter. Any portion of the two hundred dollars not used in paying the per diem and expenses of the board in the case shall be paid into the electrical license fund.

[ 2001 c 211 s 7; 1988 c 81 s 9; 1983 c 206 s 10; 1935 c 169 s 13; RRS s 8307-13. Formerly RCW 19.28.300.]